California, session 20252026, AB977.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 8028.73 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:8028.73. In alignment with the policy established pursuant to Section 8028.7 and consistent with the federal Native American Graves Protection and Repatriation Act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 3001 et seq.), the California State University shall, in consultation with California Indian tribes, develop a policy for the reburial of Native American human remains repatriated by the California State University on land owned by the California State University. The policy shall do both of the following:(a) Require the California State University to consult on topics with California Indian tribes, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(1) Campus space or land availability and its location.(2) California Indian tribes culturally affiliated with the potential reburial land.(3) Long-term protection and stewardship responsibilities.(4) Compliance with all applicable federal, tribal, state, and local laws.(5) Other burial-related topics as requested by consulting parties.(6) Tribal cultural protocols access and use.(7) Confidentiality.(b) Require that any proposed location for the reburial of repatriated Native American human remains by the California State University be mutually agreed upon by the California State University and California Indian tribes culturally affiliated with the potential reburial land.